print/texk/texmf/tex/tugboat/germanhyph.tex
r5r6a
r5re
rres2
r1ri
r1ro
r3ru
6r1s
r6sanf
r3sche
rschri6
rs2k
r6sku
rs2n
rs2p
rswi3
rswid4
r1t
rt3ac
r2t1ar
r6t5erl
r6t5erm
rt1he
r2t1hi
rt4so
rt6s5ti
1ruf
2rum
6rundz
r6ung.
6r1unt
6r1u4r3
ru1ta
r1v
r1w
ry2
r1z
rz5ac
r6zad
r6z1ar
r2z1em
1sa
2s1ab
sab5l
s3a4der
sa1fa
sa3fl
sa3fr
sa5ik
sa1la
2s1alp
5sam.
5samk
s3anb
san2c
s6ann
2s1ap
2s1ar
3s4ar.
2s1atl
4s1aus
2s1b
2sch.
2schb
1sche
4schec
schen4b
schen4h
schen4z
2schf
4schh
1schi
2schk
sch6ne
3schof
6schp
3schri
2schs
2scht
sch5ta
5schu
6schv
2s1d
1se
se5ag
6s5ec
se4e
see5i
se6h5a
6s1eig
5s6eit
4selem
sen6e
6sersa
se5ru
se6ruh
ser6um
s1erz
2s1ex
2s1f
2s1g2
2s1h
1si
si1b
si1en
4s3inte
si5ru
si1sc
s1j
s1k
6sk.
3skiz
s5ku
2s1l
5slav
s5li
2s1m
s1n
1so
s2on
s1ord
so1re
4sorga
sp2
1spal
spani5e
6spap
s2pei
1spek
s2pez
s1pf2
1spi
6spil
2s3pla
1spr
s5ps
s6pul
1spur
s1q
2s1r4
2s5s2
ssag6
ssali6
ssen6st
1s2t
2st.
st2ab
4staf
2stag
2stak
st5anb
4stanf
st3ans
4starbei
4staus
2stb
2std
ste6g5
st4ei
ste6ne
ste5re
6sterm
6st3eur
6s5tex
2stf
2stg
2sth
st3ho
6stj
2stk
2stl
2stm
6stn
2stp
6stref
6strun
2st1s
5s6tub
5s6tun
2stv
2stw
4stz
1su
su6b3
such4s
2s1v
2s1w
swi2d1
1sy
2s1z
szula6
ta4bla
2tac
3tafe
3t4ag
ta2g1a
ta6ka
6tamp
t1amt
tan6c
t5anf
tan6k5l
4tanl
6tanw
4tarb
t3arbe
t1arm
ta1sc
ta6sto
3taube.
2t1b2
tbi6b5
2t1c
2t1d
1te
te2a
5techn
2teh
teh5l
4teif
3teil
tei4l3a
4teinh
6t1eis
te6lau
te6lo
ten1a
ten5g
te2ni
ten3s6p
te6nu
te3ral
te4ren
te5ren.
te6r5it
3term
t5e6se
3test
te6sto
te6str
te5th
te3xa
2t1f2
2t1g2
6th.
2t1ha
t1heb
2t1hei
3theo
1thes
thi1s
2th1l
th3m
1thr
3thus
2t1id
ti1en
tik6
t3ind
ti6q
ti5tr
t1j
2t1k
2t5l6
tle4digt
tlo4b
2t1m
2t5n
to5be
to1ch
tode2
to6del
to4d3er
toh1
toi6r
t2on
to1ra
t1ord
to1re
5tou
2t1p
tpf2
tr4a
6trad
3trag
tra1s
4trec
t3rech
5t6ree
5t6ref
6treg
t5reih
t5rep
3t4ret
3trib
t6rie
5trieb
5t6rigk
tri4o3
t6rop
t3rot.
2trs
5trun
2ts
t2s1an
t2s1au
t1sc
t5sche
ts3ort
t1spa
ts3th
ts3un
t2s1ur
2t1t
t5ta.
tt5ab
tt3eif
t5t6ra
tt1re
t6tro
tt5ru
1tu
6tuh
tul4p
5tum.
tun6f
6t1unt
tu4ran
tur2m3
2t1v
2t1w
1ty
2tz
tz1an
t6zent
tz6th
tz5wi
u6ale
u1ar.
u1br
ubs2k
6uc
uch3a
u1che
u1chi
uch1l
uch1r
u1chu
uch1w
u1d
udi3en
u6d5on
u1e
ue2n
uen1e
uer1a
u1fa
u6f3ent
uff2l
uf1la
uf1re
u1g
u6gabt
ug5am
ug2gl
u2gl
u2gn
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
u1ho
uh1re
u1ie2
ui5em
u1ig
u3in.
u1j
u1ke
u1kl
ukle5i
u1kn
u1la
u1le
ul6lo
u1lo
ulo6i
ul6sa
u1lu
um5ak
1uml
3umschl
u1mu
u1n1a
un6al
un4d3ar
5undz
un1e
une2b
une6d
3unfal
un1gl
un5gn
un2g3r
ungs1
ungs3ta
un1in
u4nion
un1kl
un1o
1unr
un1s2p
3unterr
u5n1u
unvol4
unvoll3
u1or
u5os.
u1pa
upe6
uper3
up6fi
u1pi
u1pr
up2ta
up6tr
up4tur
u1ra
ura6d
ur6an.
u1re
ur5eis
u1ri
1url
ur6nan
u1ro
3ursa
u1ru
ur2za
ur2z1w
usch3w
us5im
us3tau
ute5re
ut5h
ut6her
u1ti
u1to
u1tr
ut4schl
ut6s5t
u1u
u1v
u1w
u1z
va6t5a
va6tei
ve2r1
vera6
ver5b2
vere2
ve2sp
vete3
2v1g
vi4el
vi5et
vi6la
vi3ro
vi1ru
v2o
vol4k
vo6n
vor5a
vor1c
vo4r1e
2v1t
wa4g3n
1wald
wan6dar
war5u
war2z5
1was
w6e
wede5r
we6fl
we6ga
we6g5eng
we6g5es
weg1l
we2g3r
weib4s
1weis
wei5sc
wel4t
welt3a
welt3r
we4ra
werbe3
werbes4
wer6bl
wer4fl
wer6ga
wer4ka
wer4kl
wer6ta
we2sp
we6str
1wid
wil6den
wil6dr
win4d3r
wi1sc
wi6schl
wi6schn
wo1c
wo3ren
wo6r5i
wor5u
wu1s
wu2t1
4w3w
x1ak
6x5amt
x5and
xan5t
1xe
x1emp
x5erz
6x1h
1xi
xi5c
xich6
x1k
x6o
x1p2
6x1t
x6ta
xti6
1xu
6xy
x1z
y5al.
y1c
y1d
y1e6
y1g
y5i
y1k2
yklo3
y1l
ym1
yna5
yn5e
yn1t
y5om
y1p
ype4
yper3
y6ps
y2p3t
y1r
yr5r6
y1s
y6te
y1t6h
y1ti
y1z
6z5ab
z3a4der
1zah
z5al
6z5am
zanla6
z1arb
zausga6
2z1b
6z5c
6zd
1ze
zei6t5er
ze5m6e
zen3a
zen6za
ze5ra
zerhau6
2z1f
2z1g
2z1h
1zi
zi3alg
zi5alr
zi5cho
zi1en
z3imp
6z5inf
6zinh
zinha6
zin6ser
zi1sc
zi3th
zi3tr
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
4z1n
5zo
zo5f
zo6gl
zo5re
zor4na
2z1p
2z1r
2z1s6
2z1t
z4t3end
zte5r
zt5hi
1zu
zu1a
zu1b2
zuch4
zucht3
zu1f2
zu5i
zun2a
zun2e
6zunt
zu3o
zu1s
zu1t
2z1v
3zwan
2z1wer
zwer6k5
z3wo
zy5
2z5z6}
